Mississippi, session 2026, SB2294.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following shall be codified as Section 37-13-215, Mississippi Code of 1972: 37-13-215.  (1) Beginning with the entering ninth-grade class of 2029-2030, a public high school student shall, before graduation, be required to earn one (1) unit of credit in a high-school computer science course, or one (1) unit of credit in an industry-aligned career and technical education (CTE) with embedded computer science course providing instruction in the foundations of computer science. Either credit unit must be approved by the State Board of Education.  This computer science requirement shall not increase the number of state-required credits for graduation. (2)  For a traditional diploma, each credit earned for a State-Board-of-Education-approved computer science course or CTE with embedded computer science course shall meet state graduation requirements for computer science and for one (1) of the following: (a)  One (1) credit in mathematics (excluding Algebra I, Geometry and Algebra II requirements); or (b)  One (1) credit in science (excluding biology and one (1) physical science requirement). (3)  The computer science course or courses fulfilling this graduation requirement must include instruction on the fundamental concepts of emerging computer science technologies, such as artificial intelligence (AI), including an understanding of what AI is, how it works, and its impact on society. SECTION 2.  Section 37-13-205, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-13-205.  As used in Sections 37-13-201 through * * * 37‑13‑213 37-13-215, the following terms shall have the meaning ascribed in this section: (a)  "Career and technical education with embedded computer science course" means a high school career and technical education (CTE) course that, in addition to its primary content, provides instruction in the foundations of computer science and is approved by the State Board of Education as a "career and technical education with embedded computer science course." ( * * *ab)  "Computer science" means the study of computers, algorithmic processes, coding, and logical thinking, including computer principles, their hardware and software designs, emerging technologies, such as artificial intelligence (AI), their implementation and their impact on society. ( * * *bc)  "Computer science courses" means high school and middle school courses that teach computer science as stand-alone implementations; and elementary curriculum that provides instruction in computer science as stand-alone implementations or embedded in other subjects and focuses on how to create and understand technology, rather than simply using technology. ( * * *cd)  "Offer" means providing instruction with appropriately endorsed teachers, for any computer science course which awards a Carnegie unit.  At the elementary level, instruction may be offered by a licensed teacher or paraprofessional who is under the guidance or supervision of a licensed teacher, and who has received training for computer science instruction approved by the State Department of Education: (i)  Who is onsite at the physical location of the school; or (ii)  Who is not onsite at the physical location of the school but conducts the course through virtual means with a proctor onsite at the physical location of the school. ( * * *de)  "Paraprofessional" consists of school employees who support instructional delivery and are deemed to be qualified and have received the professional learning opportunities to perform the job functions associated with providing instruction. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.